lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 12065 Y 4
SFX 12065 ilti yla/556 . 350
SFX 12065 iltis ylasi/556 . 350
SFX 12065 ilti ilsta/556 . 350
SFX 12065 iltis ilstasi/556 . 350

SFX 12066 Y 4
SFX 12066 ilti yla/557 . 350
SFX 12066 iltis ylasi/557 . 350
SFX 12066 ilti ilsta/557 . 350
SFX 12066 iltis ilstasi/557 . 350

SFX 12067 Y 4
SFX 12067 ilti yla/558 . 350
SFX 12067 iltis ylasi/558 . 350
SFX 12067 ilti ilsta/558 . 350
SFX 12067 iltis ilstasi/558 . 350

SFX 12068 Y 4
SFX 12068 ilti yla/559 . 350
SFX 12068 iltis ylasi/559 . 350
SFX 12068 ilti ilsta/559 . 350
SFX 12068 iltis ilstasi/559 . 350

SFX 12069 Y 4
SFX 12069 ilti yla/560 . 350
SFX 12069 iltis ylasi/560 . 350
SFX 12069 ilti ilsta/560 . 350
SFX 12069 iltis ilstasi/560 . 350

SFX 12070 Y 4
SFX 12070 ilti yla/561 . 350
SFX 12070 iltis ylasi/561 . 350
SFX 12070 ilti ilsta/561 . 350
SFX 12070 iltis ilstasi/561 . 350

SFX 12071 Y 4
SFX 12071 ilti yla/562 . 350
SFX 12071 iltis ylasi/562 . 350
SFX 12071 ilti ilsta/562 . 350
SFX 12071 iltis ilstasi/562 . 350

SFX 12081 Y 2
SFX 12081 ilti ylie/563 . 350
SFX 12081 ilti ilstie/563 . 350

SFX 12082 Y 2
SFX 12082 iltis ylie/564 . 350
SFX 12082 iltis ilstie/564 . 350

SFX 12103 Y 2
SFX 12103 ilti ilo/565 . 351
SFX 12103 iltis ilosi/565 . 351

SFX 12104 Y 2
SFX 12104 ilti ilo/566 . 351
SFX 12104 iltis ilosi/566 . 351

SFX 12105 Y 2
SFX 12105 ilti ilo/567 . 351
SFX 12105 iltis ilosi/567 . 351

SFX 12109 Y 2
SFX 12109 ti ti/544 . 349
SFX 12109 tis tis/544 . 349

SFX 12110 Y 2
SFX 12110 ti ti/545 . 349
SFX 12110 tis tis/545 . 349

SFX 12111 Y 2
SFX 12111 ti ti/546 . 349
SFX 12111 tis tis/546 . 349

SFX 12112 Y 2
SFX 12112 ti ti/547 . 349
SFX 12112 tis tis/547 . 349

SFX 12113 Y 2
SFX 12113 ti ti/548 . 349
SFX 12113 tis tis/548 . 349

SFX 12114 Y 2
SFX 12114 ti ti/549 . 349
SFX 12114 tis tis/549 . 349

SFX 12115 Y 2
SFX 12115 ti ti/550 . 349
SFX 12115 tis tis/550 . 349

SFX 12116 Y 2
SFX 12116 ti ti/551 . 349
SFX 12116 tis tis/551 . 349

SFX 12117 Y 2
SFX 12117 ti ti/552 . 349
SFX 12117 tis tis/552 . 349

SFX 12118 Y 2
SFX 12118 ti ti/553 . 349
SFX 12118 tis tis/553 . 349

SFX 12129 Y 2
SFX 12129 ti šta/554 . 350
SFX 12129 tis štasi/554 . 350

SFX 12130 Y 2
SFX 12130 ti šta/555 . 350
SFX 12130 tis štasi/555 . 350

SFX 12131 Y 2
SFX 12131 ti šta/556 . 350
SFX 12131 tis štasi/556 . 350

SFX 12132 Y 2
SFX 12132 ti šta/557 . 350
SFX 12132 tis štasi/557 . 350

SFX 12133 Y 2
SFX 12133 ti šta/558 . 350
SFX 12133 tis štasi/558 . 350

SFX 12134 Y 2
SFX 12134 ti šta/559 . 350
SFX 12134 tis štasi/559 . 350

SFX 12135 Y 2
SFX 12135 ti šta/560 . 350
SFX 12135 tis štasi/560 . 350

SFX 12136 Y 2
SFX 12136 ti šta/561 . 350
SFX 12136 tis štasi/561 . 350

SFX 12137 Y 2
SFX 12137 ti šta/562 . 350
SFX 12137 tis štasi/562 . 350

SFX 12147 Y 1
SFX 12147 ti štie/563 . 350

SFX 12148 Y 1
SFX 12148 tis štie/564 . 350

SFX 12149 Y 2
SFX 12149 ti ė/565 . 351
SFX 12149 tis ėsi/565 . 351

SFX 12150 Y 2
SFX 12150 ti ė/566 . 351
SFX 12150 tis ėsi/566 . 351

SFX 12151 Y 2
SFX 12151 ti ė/567 . 351
SFX 12151 tis ėsi/567 . 351

SFX 12155 Y 2
SFX 12155 ti ti/544 . 349
SFX 12155 tis tis/544 . 349

SFX 12156 Y 2
SFX 12156 ti ti/545 . 349
SFX 12156 tis tis/545 . 349

SFX 12157 Y 2
SFX 12157 ti ti/546 . 349
SFX 12157 tis tis/546 . 349

SFX 12158 Y 2
SFX 12158 ti ti/547 . 349
SFX 12158 tis tis/547 . 349

SFX 12159 Y 2
SFX 12159 ti ti/548 . 349
SFX 12159 tis tis/548 . 349

SFX 12160 Y 2
SFX 12160 ti ti/549 . 349
SFX 12160 tis tis/549 . 349

SFX 12161 Y 2
SFX 12161 ti ti/550 . 349
SFX 12161 tis tis/550 . 349

SFX 12162 Y 2
SFX 12162 ti ti/551 . 349
SFX 12162 tis tis/551 . 349

SFX 12163 Y 2
SFX 12163 ti ti/552 . 349
SFX 12163 tis tis/552 . 349

SFX 12164 Y 2
SFX 12164 ti ti/553 . 349
SFX 12164 tis tis/553 . 349

SFX 12175 Y 2
SFX 12175 ti ta/554 . 350
SFX 12175 tis tasi/554 . 350

SFX 12176 Y 2
SFX 12176 ti ta/555 . 350
SFX 12176 tis tasi/555 . 350

SFX 12177 Y 2
SFX 12177 ti ta/556 . 350
SFX 12177 tis tasi/556 . 350

SFX 12178 Y 2
SFX 12178 ti ta/557 . 350
SFX 12178 tis tasi/557 . 350

SFX 12179 Y 2
SFX 12179 ti ta/558 . 350
SFX 12179 tis tasi/558 . 350

SFX 12180 Y 2
SFX 12180 ti ta/559 . 350
SFX 12180 tis tasi/559 . 350

SFX 12181 Y 2
SFX 12181 ti ta/560 . 350
SFX 12181 tis tasi/560 . 350

SFX 12182 Y 2
SFX 12182 ti ta/561 . 350
SFX 12182 tis tasi/561 . 350

SFX 12183 Y 2
SFX 12183 ti ta/562 . 350
SFX 12183 tis tasi/562 . 350

SFX 12193 Y 1
SFX 12193 ti tie/563 . 350

SFX 12194 Y 1
SFX 12194 tis tie/564 . 350

SFX 12195 Y 2
SFX 12195 ti do/565 . 351
SFX 12195 tis dosi/565 . 351

SFX 12196 Y 2
SFX 12196 ti do/566 . 351
SFX 12196 tis dosi/566 . 351

SFX 12197 Y 2
SFX 12197 ti do/567 . 351
SFX 12197 tis dosi/567 . 351

SFX 12201 Y 2
SFX 12201 ušti ušti/544 . 349
SFX 12201 uštis uštis/544 . 349

SFX 12202 Y 2
SFX 12202 ušti ušti/545 . 349
SFX 12202 uštis uštis/545 . 349

SFX 12203 Y 2
SFX 12203 ušti ušti/546 . 349
SFX 12203 uštis uštis/546 . 349

SFX 12204 Y 2
SFX 12204 ušti ušti/547 . 349
SFX 12204 uštis uštis/547 . 349

SFX 12205 Y 2
SFX 12205 ušti ušti/548 . 349
SFX 12205 uštis uštis/548 . 349

SFX 12206 Y 2
SFX 12206 ušti ušti/549 . 349
SFX 12206 uštis uštis/549 . 349

SFX 12207 Y 2
SFX 12207 ušti ušti/550 . 349
SFX 12207 uštis uštis/550 . 349

SFX 12208 Y 2
SFX 12208 ušti ušti/551 . 349
SFX 12208 uštis uštis/551 . 349

SFX 12209 Y 2
SFX 12209 ušti ušti/552 . 349
SFX 12209 uštis uštis/552 . 349

SFX 12210 Y 2
SFX 12210 ušti ušti/553 . 349
SFX 12210 uštis uštis/553 . 349

SFX 12221 Y 2
SFX 12221 ušti ūšta/554 . 350
SFX 12221 uštis ūštasi/554 . 350

SFX 12222 Y 2
SFX 12222 ušti ūšta/555 . 350
SFX 12222 uštis ūštasi/555 . 350

SFX 12223 Y 2
SFX 12223 ušti ūšta/556 . 350
SFX 12223 uštis ūštasi/556 . 350

SFX 12224 Y 2
SFX 12224 ušti ūšta/557 . 350
SFX 12224 uštis ūštasi/557 . 350

SFX 12225 Y 2
SFX 12225 ušti ūšta/558 . 350
SFX 12225 uštis ūštasi/558 . 350

SFX 12226 Y 2
SFX 12226 ušti ūšta/559 . 350
SFX 12226 uštis ūštasi/559 . 350

SFX 12227 Y 2
SFX 12227 ušti ūšta/560 . 350
SFX 12227 uštis ūštasi/560 . 350

SFX 12228 Y 2
SFX 12228 ušti ūšta/561 . 350
SFX 12228 uštis ūštasi/561 . 350

SFX 12229 Y 2
SFX 12229 ušti ūšta/562 . 350
SFX 12229 uštis ūštasi/562 . 350

SFX 12239 Y 1
SFX 12239 ušti ūštie/563 . 350

SFX 12240 Y 1
SFX 12240 uštis ūštie/564 . 350

SFX 12241 Y 2
SFX 12241 ušti ušo/565 . 351
SFX 12241 uštis ušosi/565 . 351

SFX 12242 Y 2
SFX 12242 ušti ušo/566 . 351
SFX 12242 uštis ušosi/566 . 351

SFX 12243 Y 2
SFX 12243 ušti ušo/567 . 351
SFX 12243 uštis ušosi/567 . 351

SFX 12247 Y 2
SFX 12247 uzti uzti/544 . 349
SFX 12247 uztis uztis/544 . 349

SFX 12248 Y 2
SFX 12248 uzti uzti/545 . 349
SFX 12248 uztis uztis/545 . 349

SFX 12249 Y 2
SFX 12249 uzti uzti/546 . 349
SFX 12249 uztis uztis/546 . 349

SFX 12250 Y 2
SFX 12250 uzti uzti/547 . 349
SFX 12250 uztis uztis/547 . 349

SFX 12251 Y 2
SFX 12251 uzti uzti/548 . 349
SFX 12251 uztis uztis/548 . 349

SFX 12252 Y 2
SFX 12252 uzti uzti/549 . 349
SFX 12252 uztis uztis/549 . 349

SFX 12253 Y 2
SFX 12253 uzti uzti/550 . 349
SFX 12253 uztis uztis/550 . 349

SFX 12254 Y 2
SFX 12254 uzti uzti/551 . 349
SFX 12254 uztis uztis/551 . 349

SFX 12255 Y 2
SFX 12255 uzti uzti/552 . 349
SFX 12255 uztis uztis/552 . 349

SFX 12256 Y 2
SFX 12256 uzti uzti/553 . 349
SFX 12256 uztis uztis/553 . 349

SFX 12267 Y 2
SFX 12267 uzti ūzda/554 . 350
SFX 12267 uztis ūzdasi/554 . 350

SFX 12268 Y 2
SFX 12268 uzti ūzda/555 . 350
SFX 12268 uztis ūzdasi/555 . 350

SFX 12269 Y 2
SFX 12269 uzti ūzda/556 . 350
SFX 12269 uztis ūzdasi/556 . 350

SFX 12270 Y 2
SFX 12270 uzti ūzda/557 . 350
SFX 12270 uztis ūzdasi/557 . 350

SFX 12271 Y 2
SFX 12271 uzti ūzda/558 . 350
SFX 12271 uztis ūzdasi/558 . 350

SFX 12272 Y 2
SFX 12272 uzti ūzda/559 . 350
SFX 12272 uztis ūzdasi/559 . 350

SFX 12273 Y 2
SFX 12273 uzti ūzda/560 . 350
SFX 12273 uztis ūzdasi/560 . 350

SFX 12274 Y 2
SFX 12274 uzti ūzda/561 . 350
SFX 12274 uztis ūzdasi/561 . 350

SFX 12275 Y 2
SFX 12275 uzti ūzda/562 . 350
SFX 12275 uztis ūzdasi/562 . 350

SFX 12285 Y 1
SFX 12285 uzti ūzdie/563 . 350

SFX 12286 Y 1
SFX 12286 uztis ūzdie/564 . 350

AF 12109,12110,12129,12149,65521 # 177
AF 12043,12044,12063,12103,65521 # 212
AF 12201,12202,12221,12241,65521 # 213
AF 12155,12156,12175,12195,65521 # 348
AF 12247,12248,12267,12287,65521 # 495
