lt_LT.dic
apmirti/177	12
aptilti/212	12
aptriušti/213	12
atmirti/177	12
bemirti/177	12
grimzti/348	12
išmirti/177	12
mirti/177	12
neapmirti/177	34
neaptilti/212	34
neaptriušti/213	34
nebegrimzti/348	34
nebemirti/177	34
nebenumirti/177	34
nebenutilti/212	34
nebetilti/212	34
negrimzti/348	34
neišmirti/177	34
nemirti/177	34
nenugrimzti/348	34
nenumirti/177	34
nenutilti/212	34
nenutriušti/213	34
nepasimirti/177	35
nepražilti/212	34
nepritilti/212	34
netilti/212	34
neužmirti/177	34
neužtilti/212	34
neįgrimzti/348	34
nežilti/212	34
nugrimzti/348	12
numirti/177	12
nutilti/212	12
nutriušti/213	12
nužilti/212	12
pasimirti/177	14
patriušti/213	12
pražilti/212	12
pritilti/212	12
subruzti/495	12
sutriušti/213	12
tebegrimzti/348	12
tebemirti/177	12
temirti/177	12
teneišmirti/177	34
tenenutilti/212	34
tenumirti/177	12
tenutilti/212	12
tepražilti/212	12
tilti/212	12
užmirti/177	12
užtilti/212	12
įgrimzti/348	12
žilti/212	12
